Washington statutes.
RCW 19.68.020

Deemed unprofessional conduct.

The acceptance directly or indirectly by any person so licensed of any rebate, refund, commission, unearned discount, or profit by means of a credit or other valuable consideration whether in the form of money or otherwise, as compensation for referring patients to any person, firm, corporation or association as set forth in RCW 19.68.030, constitutes unprofessional conduct.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 58 s 2; 1949 c 204 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10185-15.]